src/test/groovy/data/hunspellTestsPlus/cop_EG.aff
#----------------------------------
#     written by Moheb S. Mekhaiel
#     mohebm@gmx.de
#     copt@moheb.de
#     ver 0.2
#     Dec. 2006   http://www.moheb.de/coptic_proofing.html
#------------------------------------
# 	used Flags
#	ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
#      ABCDEFG#####MN#P#RST#V####
#	abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz
#	abcdef###j##mnop#rstuvwxyz
#---------------------------------------
# Note: if you uncommnet any line in the PFX or SFX definitions
# do not reduce the total number in its header. It seems to be a bug
# in hunspell
#

SET UTF-8

TRY ⲑⲱ̀ⲉⲣⲧⲯⲩⲓⲟⲡⲁⲥⲇⲫⲅⲏϫⲕⲗⲍⲝⲭϣⲃⲛⲙϣϯϥϩϧϭⲐⲰⲈⲢⲦⲮⲨⲒⲞⲠⲀⲤⲆⲪⲄⲎϪⲔⲖⲌⲜⲬϢⲂⲚⲘϢϮϤϨϦϬ
WORDCHARS ⲑ̀ⲱⲉⲣⲧ̀ⲯⲩⲓⲟⲡⲁⲥⲇⲫⲅⲏϫⲕⲗⲍⲝⲭϣⲃⲛⲙϣϯϥϩϧϭⲐⲰⲈⲢⲦⲮⲨⲒⲞⲠⲀⲤⲆⲪⲄⲎϪⲔⲖⲌⲜⲬϢⲂⲚⲘϢϮϤϨϦϬ

COMPLEXPREFIXES
COMPOUNDMIN 2
#PSEUDOROOT U

REP 34
REP ⲫ̀ⲓⲱⲧ Ⲫ̀ⲓⲱⲧ
REP ⲁⲣⲓ ⲙⲁ
REP ⲙⲁ ⲁⲣⲓ
REP ⲛⲅ ⲅⲅ
REP ⲅ ϫ
REP ϫ ⲅ
REP ⲙ ⲛ
REP ⲛ ⲙ
REP ⲡ ⲣ
REP ⲣ ⲡ
REP Ⲡ̀ Ⲡ
REP Ⲡ Ⲡ̀
REP ⲡ̀ ⲡ
REP ⲡ ⲡ̀
REP ⲥ̀ ⲥ
REP ⲥ ⲥ̀
REP ⲫ̀ ⲫ
REP ⲫ ⲫ̀
REP ⲉ̀ ⲉ
REP ⲉ ⲉ̀
REP ⲛ̀ ⲛ
REP ⲛ ⲛ̀
REP ⲟ̀ ⲟ
REP ⲟ ⲟ̀
REP ⲙ̀ ⲙ
REP ⲙ ⲙ̀
REP ⲏ̀ ⲏ
REP ⲏ ⲏ̀
REP ⲧ̀ ⲧ
REP ⲧ ⲧ̀
REP ϥ̀ ϥ
REP ϥ ϥ̀
REP ϯ ⲧⲓ
REP ⲧⲓ ϯ

################# higer level prefixes #########

# PFX E : most higher level (can not get a prefix before)
PFX E Y 6
PFX E 0 ⲁ .
PFX E 0 ⲉ̀ .
PFX E 0 ⲛ̀ [^ⲃⲙⲡⲫⲯϥⲂⲘⲠⲪⲮϥ]
PFX E 0 ⲛ̀ [̀^ⲃⲙⲡⲫⲯϥⲂⲘⲠⲪⲮϥ]
PFX E 0 ⲙ̀ [ⲃⲙⲡⲫⲯϥⲂⲘⲠⲪⲮϥ]
PFX E 0 ⲙ̀ [̀ⲃⲙⲡⲫⲯϥⲂⲘⲠⲪⲮϥ]

#relative pronoun
PFX V Y 4
PFX V 0 ⲉⲧ [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX V 0 ⲉⲧ [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX V 0 ⲉⲑ [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX V 0 ⲉⲑ [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]

#masculine relative pronoun
PFX A Y 17
PFX A 0 ⲡⲉⲧ .
PFX A 0 ⲫⲏⲉ .
PFX A 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧ [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX A 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧ [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX A 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲑ [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX A 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲑ [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX A 0 ⲫⲏⲉⲧ/E ⲟⲩ
PFX A 0 ⲙ̀ⲫⲏⲉ .
PFX A 0 ⲙ̀ⲫⲏⲉⲧ [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX A 0 ⲙ̀ⲫⲏⲉⲧ [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX A 0 ⲙ̀ⲫⲏⲉⲑ [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX A 0 ⲙ̀ⲫⲏⲉⲑ [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX A 0 ⲉ̀ⲫⲏⲉ .
PFX A 0 ⲉ̀ⲫⲏⲉⲧ [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX A 0 ⲉ̀ⲫⲏⲉⲧ [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX A 0 ⲉ̀ⲫⲏⲉⲑ [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX A 0 ⲉ̀ⲫⲏⲉⲑ [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]

#feminine relative pronoun
PFX B Y 15
PFX B 0 ⲑⲏⲉ .
PFX B 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧ [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX B 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧ [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX B 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲑ [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX B 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲑ [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX B 0 ⲛ̀ⲑⲏⲉ .
PFX B 0 ⲛ̀ⲑⲏⲉⲧ [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX B 0 ⲛ̀ⲑⲏⲉⲧ [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX B 0 ⲛ̀ⲑⲏⲉⲑ [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX B 0 ⲛ̀ⲑⲏⲉⲑ [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX B 0 ⲉ̀ⲑⲏⲉ .
PFX B 0 ⲉ̀ⲑⲏⲉⲧ [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX B 0 ⲉ̀ⲑⲏⲉⲧ [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX B 0 ⲉ̀ⲑⲏⲉⲑ [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX B 0 ⲉ̀ⲑⲏⲉⲑ [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]

#plural relative pronoun
PFX C Y 15
PFX C 0 ⲛⲏⲉ .
PFX C 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧ/E [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX C 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲧ/E [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX C 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲑ/E [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX C 0 ⲛⲏⲉⲑ/E [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX C 0 ⲛ̀ⲛⲏⲉ .
PFX C 0 ⲛ̀ⲛⲏⲉⲧ/E [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX C 0 ⲛ̀ⲛⲏⲉⲧ/E [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX C 0 ⲛ̀ⲛⲏⲉⲑ/E [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX C 0 ⲛ̀ⲛⲏⲉⲑ/E [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX C 0 ⲉ̀ⲛⲏⲉ .
PFX C 0 ⲉ̀ⲛⲏⲉⲧ/E [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX C 0 ⲉ̀ⲛⲏⲉⲧ/E [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX C 0 ⲉ̀ⲛⲏⲉⲑ/E [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX C 0 ⲉ̀ⲛⲏⲉⲑ/E [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]

PFX T Y 5
PFX T 0 ⲡⲉⲧ [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] REL_PRONOUN
PFX T 0 ⲡⲉⲧ [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX T 0 ⲡⲉⲑ [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] REL_PRONOUN
PFX T 0 ⲡⲉⲑ [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX T 0 ⲛⲉⲧ . REL_PRONOUN

#####################adjectives  ################
# adjectives + prefixes for the 4th verb form (qualitative)
#   - can get the prefix of the 3rd present tense
#   - can get the prefix of imperfect
#   - can get the prefix of 1st present
#   - can get the first present articles (126)
# 
PFX j Y 42
PFX j 0 /V/A/B/C/E .
PFX j 0 ⲡⲓ/E .
PFX j 0 ⲛⲓ/E .
PFX j 0 ⲟⲩ/E .
PFX j 0 ϩⲁⲛ/E .
PFX j 0 ⲥⲁ/E .
PFX j 0 ⲁⲣⲉ .
PFX j 0 ⲉⲧ .
PFX j 0 ⲁⲕ .
PFX j 0 ⲁⲥ .
PFX j 0 ⲁϥ .
PFX j 0 ⲁⲩ .
PFX j 0 ⲡⲉⲧ/E . REL_PRONOUN
PFX j 0 ⲡⲉⲑ/E [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] REL_PRONOUN
PFX j 0 ⲡⲉⲑ/E [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] REL_PRONOUN
PFX j 0 ⲉⲓ . PRESENT3_1PSG
PFX j 0 ⲉⲕ . PRESENT3_2PSGM
PFX j 0 ⲉⲣⲉ . PRESENT3_2PSGF
PFX j 0 ⲉϥ . PRESENT3_3PSGM
PFX j 0 ⲉⲥ . PRESENT3_3PSGF
PFX j 0 ⲉⲛ . PRESENT3_1PPL
PFX j 0 ⲉⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ . PRESENT3_2PPL
PFX j 0 ⲉⲩ . PRESENT3_3PPL
PFX j 0 ⲛⲁⲓ/A/V/E . IMPERFECT_1PSG
PFX j 0 ⲛⲁⲕ/A/V/E . IMPERFECT_2PSGM
PFX j 0 ⲛⲁⲣⲉ/B/V/E . IMPERFECT_2PSGF
PFX j 0 ⲛⲁϥ/A/V/E . IMPERFECT_3PSGM
PFX j 0 ⲛⲁⲥ/B/V/E . IMPERFECT_3PSGF
PFX j 0 ⲛⲁⲛ/C/V/E . IMPERFECT_1PPL
PFX j 0 ⲛⲁⲣⲉⲧⲉⲛ/C/V/E . IMPERFECT_2PPL
PFX j 0 ⲛⲁⲩ/C/V/E . IMPERFECT_3PPL
PFX j 0 ϯ/A/V/E . PRESENT1_1PSG
PFX j 0 ⲕ̀/A/V/E [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] PRESENT1_2PSGM
PFX j 0 ⲕ̀/A/V/E [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] PRESENT1_2PSGM
PFX j 0 ⲭ̀/A/V/E [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] PRESENT1_2PSGM
PFX j 0 ⲭ̀/A/V/E [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ] PRESENT1_2PSGM
PFX j 0 ⲧⲉ/B/V/E . PRESENT1_2PSGF_p126
PFX j 0 ϥ̀/A/V/E . PRESENT1_3PSGM_p126
PFX j 0 ⲥ̀/B/V/E . PRESENT1_3PSGF_p126
PFX j 0 ⲧⲉⲛ/C/V/E . PRESENT1_1PPL_p126
PFX j 0 ⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ/C/V/E . PRESENT1_2PPL_p126
PFX j 0 ⲥⲉ/C/V/E . PRESENT1_3PPL_p126

######################## nouns ################
# gender independant noun prefixes (Mask. + Fem.+Pl.)
PFX N Y 7
PFX N 0 /E/V .
PFX N 0 ⲥⲁ/E .
PFX N 0 ⲛⲁ/E .
PFX N 0 ⲉⲧⲉ .
PFX N 0 ⲟⲩ/E .
PFX N 0 ⲉⲩ/E . [ⲉ̀+ⲟⲩ]
PFX N 0 ⲕⲉ/E .

# possessive adjectives (only after ⲡ̀-, ⲧ̀- ⲛ̀-)
SFX D Y 8
SFX D 0 ⲁ .
SFX D 0 ⲉⲕ .
SFX D 0 ⲉ .
SFX D 0 ⲉϥ .
SFX D 0 ⲉⲥ .
SFX D 0 ⲉⲛ .
SFX D 0 ⲉⲧⲉⲛ .
SFX D 0 ⲟⲩ .

########
# Fem.
########
PFX F Y 32
PFX F 0 /V/B/E . 
PFX F 0 ⲥⲁ/E .
PFX F 0 ⲛⲁ/E .
PFX F 0 ⲛⲁⲧ̀/E .
PFX F 0 ⲛⲁⲑ̀/E .
PFX F 0 ⲛⲁⲕⲉ/E .
PFX F 0 ⲉⲧⲉ .
PFX F 0 ⲟⲩ/E .
PFX F 0 ⲉⲩ/E . [ⲉ̀+ⲟⲩ]
PFX F 0 ⲕⲉ/E .
PFX F 0 ϯⲕⲉ/E .
PFX F 0 ϯ/E .
PFX F 0 ⲧ̀ⲕⲉ/E .
PFX F 0 ⲧ̀/E [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX F 0 ⲧ̀/E [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX F 0 ⲑ̀/E [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX F 0 ⲑ̀/E [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX F 0 ⲧⲁⲓ/E . 
PFX F 0 ⲧⲁⲓⲕⲉ/E . 
PFX F 0 ⲑⲏⲉⲧⲟⲩ .
PFX F 0 ⲧⲁ/E . POSSESSIVE_1PSG
PFX F 0 ⲧⲁⲕⲉ/E . 
PFX F 0 ⲧⲉⲕ/E . POSSESSIVE_2PSGM
PFX F 0 ⲧⲉⲕⲕⲉ/E . 
PFX F 0 ⲧⲉ/E . POSSESSIVE_2PSGF
PFX F 0 ⲧⲉϥ/E . POSSESSIVE_3PSGM
PFX F 0 ⲧⲉϥⲕⲉ/E . 
PFX F 0 ⲧⲉⲥ/E . POSSESSIVE_3PSGF
PFX F 0 ⲧⲉⲛ/E . POSSESSIVE_1PPL
PFX F 0 ⲧⲉⲛⲕⲉ/E . 
PFX F 0 ⲧⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . POSSESSIVE_2PPL
PFX F 0 ⲧⲟⲩ/E . POSSESSIVE_3PPL

########
# Mask.
########
PFX M Y 33
PFX M 0 /V/A/E .
PFX M 0 ⲥⲁ/E .
PFX M 0 ⲛⲁ/E .
PFX M 0 ⲉⲧⲉ .
PFX M 0 ⲟⲩ/E .
PFX M 0 ⲉⲩ/E . [ⲉ̀+ⲟⲩ]
PFX M 0 ⲕⲉ/E .
PFX M 0 ⲡ̀ⲕⲉ/E .
PFX M 0 ⲡⲓ/E .
PFX M 0 ⲡⲓⲕⲉ/E .
PFX M 0 ⲡⲁⲓⲕⲉ/E .
PFX M 0 ⲉⲣ .
PFX M 0 ⲡ̀/E ⲟⲩ [exception]
PFX M 0 ⲡ̀/E ⲓⲁϩ [exception]
PFX M 0 ⲡ̀/E [^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX M 0 ⲡ̀/E [̀^ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX M 0 ⲫ̀/E [ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX M 0 ⲫ̀/E [̀ⲃⲓⲣⲛⲗⲟⲙⲂⲒⲢⲚⲖⲞⲘ]
PFX M 0 ⲡⲁⲓ/E .
PFX M 0 ϣⲏⲉⲑ/E ⲟⲩ
PFX M 0 ⲡⲉⲑ/E ⲟⲩ
PFX M 0 ⲡⲁ/E . POSSESSIVE_1PSG
PFX M 0 ⲡⲁⲕⲉ/E . 
PFX M 0 ⲡⲉⲕ/E . POSSESSIVE_2PSGM
PFX M 0 ⲡⲉⲕⲕⲉ/E . 
PFX M 0 ⲡⲉ/E . POSSESSIVE_2PSGF
PFX M 0 ⲡⲉϥ/E . POSSESSIVE_3PSGM
PFX M 0 ⲡⲉϥⲕⲉ/E .
PFX M 0 ⲡⲉⲥ/E . POSSESSIVE_3PSGF
PFX M 0 ⲡⲉⲛ/E . POSSESSIVE_1PPL
PFX M 0 ⲡⲉⲛⲕⲉ/E . 
PFX M 0 ⲡⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . POSSESSIVE_2PPL
PFX M 0 ⲡⲟⲩ/E . POSSESSIVE_3PPL

########
# PL.
########
PFX P Y 22
PFX P 0 /V/C/E .
PFX P 0 ⲥⲁ/E .
PFX P 0 ϩⲁⲛ/E .
PFX P 0 ϩⲁⲛⲕⲉ/E .
PFX P 0 ⲛⲓ/E .
PFX P 0 ⲫⲁⲛⲓ . 
PFX P 0 ⲛⲓⲕⲉ/E .
PFX P 0 ⲛⲉⲛ/E .
PFX P 0 ⲛⲉⲛⲕⲉ/E .
PFX P 0 ⲛⲁⲓ/E .
PFX P 0 ⲛⲁⲓⲕⲉ/E .
PFX P 0 ⲛⲁ/E . POSSESSIVE_1PSG
PFX P 0 ⲛⲉⲕ/E . POSSESSIVE_2PSGM
PFX P 0 ⲛⲉ/E . POSSESSIVE_2PSGF
PFX P 0 ⲛⲉϥ/E . POSSESSIVE_3PSGM
PFX P 0 ⲛⲉϥⲕⲉ/E .
PFX P 0 ⲛⲉⲥ/E . POSSESSIVE_3PSGF
PFX P 0 ⲛⲉⲛ/E . POSSESSIVE_1PPL
PFX P 0 ⲛⲉⲧⲉⲛ/E . POSSESSIVE_2PPL
PFX P 0 ⲛⲉⲧⲉⲛⲕⲉ/E . 
PFX P 0 ⲛⲟⲩ/E . POSSESSIVE_3PPL
PFX P 0 ⲛⲟⲩⲕⲉ/E .

# all possible SUFFIXES for nouns:
# - possessive pronouns
#
SFX S Y 8
SFX S 0 ⲧ [^ⲟⲱⲧ] ACC_1PSG
SFX S 0 ⲓ .
SFX S 0 ⲕ .
SFX S 0 ϥ .
SFX S 0 ⲥ .
SFX S 0 ⲛ .
SFX S 0 ⲧⲉⲛ .
SFX S 0 ⲟⲩ .

# Greek suffixes (to be done..)
#SFX G Y 1
# SFX G 0 ⲟⲥ .

######################## verbs ################

#------------------------------------------
# this list contains all possible PREFIXES for verbs 
# (all tenses!)
#------------------------------------------
